Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 3. Perjury and Criminal Falsification

Cross references. —

As to officers authorized to administer oaths, see §

1-2-102

.

For provision that persons conscientiously opposed to swearing or taking any oath may affirm, and shall be subject to the pains and penalty of perjury, as in the case of swearing or taking an oath, see §

1-2-103

.

As to false statements in connection with Wyoming retirement system, see §

9-3-429

.

As to false statements in documents or proceedings before the secretary of state under the Uniform Securities Act, see § 17-4-116.

As to perjury by surety in connection with affidavit required on bond of county officer, see §

18-3-102

.

As to false swearing after being challenged as a voter registration offense, see §

22-26-102

.

As to false swearing under the Election Code, see §

22-26-108

.

As to false swearing to procure a game or fish license or tag, see §

23-3-403

.

As to immunity from prosecution when testimony is compelled before the insurance commissioner, except for perjury, see §

26-2-124

.

As to one in charge of mine making false statements to the mine inspector regarding mine safety, see §

30-2-207

.

As to revocation of certificate issued to optometrist for perjury, see §

33-23-110

.

As to prohibition against use of compelled testimony before the public service commission in criminal prosecution, except for perjury, see §

37-2-209

.

As to perjury in statements under oath in connection with public utilities, see §

37-12-210

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Criminal liability of attorney for tampering with evidence, 49 ALR5th 619.

§ 6-5-301.
Perjury in judicial, legislative or administrative proceedings; penalties.

A person commits perjury if, while under a lawfully administered oath or affirmation, he knowingly testifies falsely or makes a false affidavit, certificate, declaration, deposition or statement, in a judicial, legislative or administrative proceeding in which an oath or affirmation may be required by law, touching a matter material to a point in question.

Perjury is a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Purpose of this section

with respect to a judicial proceeding is to keep the process of justice free from the contamination of false testimony. It is for the wrong done to the judicial system and the administration of justice that punishment is provided. Edwards v. State, 577 P.2d 1380,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 290

(Wyo. 1978).

Charge of perjury requires proof of three elements:

(1) The materiality of the perjured evidence upon the issue in the trial in which it was given; (2) that the defendant testified as alleged; and (3) that his testimony (evidence) was knowingly and corruptly false. Edwards v. State, 577 P.2d 1380,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 290

(Wyo. 1978); Smith v. State, 721 P.2d 1088,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 591

(Wyo. 1986).

“Material” statement defined. —

To be “material,” a statement made must have some weight and reference to the determination of an issue before the court. Although its actual effect has no bearing on materiality, the statement must be one which could influence a tribunal, even if only upon a collateral or circumstantially material point. Edwards v. State, 577 P.2d 1380,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 290

(Wyo. 1978).

Fear and duress no defense. —

Where defendant urges that his prior testimony cannot be found willfully and corruptly false since he was testifying out of fear and duress based on threats of physical harm, such compulsion cannot excuse perjury in a court, for, in a courtroom, the witness is surrounded by all the protection a court can muster. Edwards v. State, 577 P.2d 1380,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 290

(Wyo. 1978).

High quantum of proof necessary for conviction of perjury.—

See Edwards v. State, 577 P.2d 1380,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 290

(Wyo. 1978).

Jury instruction held deficient. —

See State v. Shinovich, 40 Wyo. 174, 276 P. 172,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1929).

Evidence insufficient to sustain conviction. —

See Cerns v. Territory, 3 Wyo. 269, 3 Wyo. 270, 21 P. 699,

1889 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1889).

Quoted

in

State ex rel. Hopkinson v. District Court, 696 P.2d 54,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 455

(Wyo. 1985); Harmon v. Star Valley Med. Ctr., 2014 WY 90,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Jul 16, 2014).

Cited

in

Reavis v. State, 6 Wyo. 240, 44 P. 62,

1896 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(1896); Cooney v. White, 845 P.2d 353,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 205

(Wyo. 1992).

Law reviews. —

For discussion of Fed. R. Evid. 410, relating to inadmissibility of pleas, offers of pleas, and related statements, see XII Land & Water L. Rev. 601 (1977).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Privilege against self-incrimination as affecting admissibility and prosecution for perjury of testimony given before grand jury, 38 ALR2d 225.

False oath or account as bar to discharge in bankruptcy proceedings, 59 ALR2d 791.

Recantation as defense in perjury prosecution, 64 ALR2d 276.

Statement of belief or opinion as perjury, 66 ALR2d 791.

Conviction of perjury where one or more of the elements is established solely by circumstantial evidence, 88 ALR2d 852.

Perjury as contempt, 89 ALR2d 1258.

Invalidity of statute or ordinance giving rise to proceedings in which false testimony was received as defense to prosecution for perjury, 34 ALR3d 413.

Offense of perjury as affected by lack of jurisdiction of court or government body before which false testimony was given, 36 ALR3d 1038.

Incomplete, misleading or unresponsive but literally true statement as perjury, 69 ALR3d 993.

Perjury conviction as affected by notary's nonobservance of formalities for administration of oath to affiant, 80 ALR3d 278.

Propriety of sentencing judge's consideration of defendant's perjury or lying in pleas or testimony in present trial, 34 ALR4th 888.

Materiality of testimony forming basis of perjury charge as question for court or jury in state trial, 37 ALR4th 948.

Admonitions against perjury or threats to prosecute potential defense witness, inducing refusal to testify, as prejudicial error, 88 ALR4th 388.

Right of defendant in prosecution for perjury to have the “two witnesses, or one witness and corroborating circumstances,” rule included in charge to jury — state cases, 41 ALR5th 1.

Criminal liability of attorney for tampering with evidence, 49 ALR5th 619.

Duty of prosecutor to present exculpatory evidence to state grand jury, 49 ALR5th 639.

Determination of “materiality” under 18 USC § 1623, penalizing false material declarations before grand jury or court, 60 ALR Fed 76.

§ 6-5-302.
Proof of solicitation of perjury.

In a trial for soliciting perjury, no conviction shall be had on the evidence of the person solicited, unsupported by other testimony.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3.

Cited

in

Blakeman v. State, 2004 WY 139, 100 P.3d 1229,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 179

(2004).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Criminal liability of attorney for tampering with evidence, 49 ALR5th 619.

§ 6-5-303.
False swearing in nonjudicial or nonadministrative proceeding; false claims or vouchers; penalties.

A person commits a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than two (2) years, a fine of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000.00), or both, if, while under a lawfully administered oath or affirmation in a matter where an oath is authorized by law, he knowingly makes a false certificate, affidavit, acknowledgment, declaration or statement other than in a judicial or administrative proceeding.

A person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than two (2) years, a fine of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000.00), or both, if he knowingly submits a false claim or voucher with intent to defraud.

A person who knowingly makes a false certification under W.S.

1-2-104

is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than two (2) years, a fine of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 2007, ch. 199, § 2.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added (c).

Section does not violate art. 1, § 6, Wyo. Const., for reasons of vagueness.

Nimmo v. State, 603 P.2d 386,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 485

(Wyo. 1979).

Common-law crime enacted. —

This section brings into the body of this state's law the common-law crime of false swearing, and the definition contained in the common law will be applied. Nimmo v. State, 603 P.2d 386,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 485

(Wyo. 1979).

Word “false” as used in this section means “intentionally untrue.”

Nimmo v. State, 603 P.2d 386,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 485

(Wyo. 1979).

So penalty for clerical error not intended. —

Because of the legislative reference to the words “false swearing” in enacting this section and the widely used criminal definition of “false,” it is impossible to ascribe to the legislature any intention to penalize a person for making an innocent clerical error or mistake. Nimmo v. State, 603 P.2d 386,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 485

(Wyo. 1979).

Perjury and false swearing distinguished. —

See Nimmo v. State, 603 P.2d 386,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 485

(Wyo. 1979).

Misjoinder of embezzlement-related offense, and offense of submitting false voucher for battery,

occurred as error of law. — See Howard v. State, 762 P.2d 28,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1988), reh'g denied,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. Nov. 7, 1988).

Evidence sufficient.—

Evidence was sufficient to sustain a false claim conviction, Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-5-303(b) (2017) where defendant ordered the sheriff uniforms and related items on behalf of the county and to be paid by the county, he intentionally had order dates changed on invoices to falsely indicate he ordered the items after he was sworn in as sheriff, he told representatives of one of the companies he needed to change dates on the invoices because the county commissioners were mad at him, he ordered the shredding of original invoices, and he he knew the dates were false on vouchers submitted to the commissioners for payment. Haskell v. State, 2018 WY 85, 422 P.3d 955,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 90

(Wyo. 2018).

Cited

in

Heggen v. State, 800 P.2d 475,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Wyo. 1990); Bohling v. State, 2017 WY 7, 388 P.3d 502,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 2017).

Quoted in

Harmon v. Star Valley Med. Ctr., 2014 WY 90,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Jul 16, 2014).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

False swearing as contempt, 89 ALR2d 1258.

Criminal liability under state laws in connection with application for, or receipt of, public welfare payments, 22 ALR4th 534.

§ 6-5-304.
Offering mining claims for filing without meeting legal prerequisites; penalties.

A person commits a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than two (2) years, a fine of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000.00), or both, if he offers a location certificate for a placer mining claim or a lode claim or an affidavit of assessment work to be filed with a county clerk’s office knowing the claim, certificate or affidavit was not preceded by a proper location of the claim physically upon the ground by establishing a proper notice of claim and designating the surface boundaries as required by law.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to prerequisites to filing mine location certificates, see §

30-1-103

.

As to affidavit of assessment work for any mining claim, see §

30-1-115

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 6-5-305.
Influencing, intimidating or impeding jurors, witnesses and officers; obstructing or impeding justice; penalties.

A person commits a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), or both, if, by force or threats, he attempts to influence, intimidate or impede a juror, witness or officer in the discharge of his duty.

A person commits a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or both, if, by threats or force, he obstructs or impedes the administration of justice in a court.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Application of subsection (a). —

The provisions of subsection (a) of this section applied to a situation in which an assault and battery was committed upon a witness after the trial had concluded, and he had been released from his subpoena. Smith v. State, 902 P.2d 1271,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1995).

“Witness” status maintained through affirmation of conviction.—

The potential of post-conviction relief does not justify maintaining the status of a “witness” beyond the affirmation of a conviction on direct appeal; up until that point in finality, however, a person who is a “witness” will remain a “witness,” and the provisions of subsection (a) of this section will protect that person. Smith v. State, 902 P.2d 1271,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1995).

Statute applies where proceedings not final. —

This section does apply in an instance in which the proceedings have not become final after appeal, and therefore the trial judge did not abuse his discretion when he overruled the defendant's hearsay objection and properly admitted the testimony concerning statements by a co-conspirator under Rule 801(d)(2)(E), W.R.E. Smith v. State, 902 P.2d 1271,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1995).

Relationship between this section and court's inherent powerto punish for contempt. —

See Fisher v. McDaniel, 9 Wyo. 457, 64 P. 1056,

1901 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1901).

Quoted

in

English v. State, 982 P.2d 139,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(Wyo. 1999); GGV v. JLR, 2002 WY 19, 39 P.3d 1066,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 2002).

Cited

in

John v. State, 6 Wyo. 203, 44 P. 51,

1896 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(1896); Elmer v. State, 463 P.2d 14,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1969); Coen v. Runner, 854 F.2d 374,

1988 U.S. App. LEXIS 11229

(10th Cir. 1988); Ochoa v. State, 848 P.2d 1359,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 1993).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and application of state statutes imposing criminal penalties for influencing or tampering with witness, 8 ALR4th 769.

Impeachment of verdict by juror's evidence that he was coerced or intimidated by fellow juror, 39 ALR4th 800.

Intentional spoliation of evidence, interfering with prospective civil action, as actionable, 70 ALR4th 984.

Admonitions against perjury or threats to prosecute potential defense witness, inducing refusal to testify, as prejudicial error, 88 ALR4th 388.

Criminal liability of attorney for tampering with evidence, 49 ALR5th 619.

Duty of prosecutor to present exculpatory evidence to state grand jury, 49 ALR5th 639.

Defenses to state obstruction of justice charge relating to interfering with criminal investigation or judicial proceeding, 87 ALR5th 597.

Negligent spoliation of evidence, interfering with prospective civil action, as actionable, 101 ALR5th 61.

Meaning of term “corruptly” for purposes of 18 USC § 1503 making it a federal offense to corruptly endeavor to influence, intimidate, impede, or injure witness, juror or officer in federal court, or to obstruct the due administration of justice, 62 ALR Fed 303.

Validity, construction, and application of federal witness tampering statute, 18 U.S.C.A. § 1512(b), 183 ALR Fed 611.

§ 6-5-306.
Refusal to appear or testify; avoidance of service; penalties; summary proceedings for contempt.

A person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both, if he:

Refuses or intentionally fails to obey a lawful subpoena or citation which has been served upon him;

Secretes himself or leaves his residence to avoid being served with a subpoena; or

Refuses to take an oath or affirmation or, being sworn or affirmed, refuses to answer a question required by the court or presiding officer.

This section shall not prevent summary proceedings for contempt.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to contempt of court for failure to obey a subpoena, see Rule 17(g), W.R. Cr. P.

As to criminal contempt generally, see Rule 42, W.R. Cr. P.

Court may punish for contempt

disobeying of summons or subpoena, though such offense is indictable. Fisher v. McDaniel, 9 Wyo. 457, 64 P. 1056,

1901 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1901).

And order committing contemner to prison until he obeys certain order is not affected by this section,

which fixes a definite punishment for witnesses who refuse to be sworn or answer questions and which expressly provides that “this section shall not prevent summary proceedings for contempt.” Ex parte Bergman, 3 Wyo. 396, 26 P. 914,

1890 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1890).

Court to explain contempt's nature and effect. —

Where a witness, who had been offered full use immunity, was cursorily warned in chambers that he would be found in contempt if he refused to testify the following day, but no attempt was made to fully explain either the nature or the effect of a finding of contempt, and the next day the district court made no attempt to question the witness about his refusal to be sworn or his understanding of the consequences of that refusal and, instead, the court angrily slapped him with a contempt charge and dismissed him from the courtroom, it was held that, at the very least, the district court should have asked witness (whose counsel was not present) if he was attempting to assert his fifth amendment privilege and, if so, first to be sworn and then claim the privilege on the record; because the totality of the circumstances demonstrated that the court failed to adequately inform the witness of the nature and effect of a finding of contempt, the contempt judgment could not stand. In re Haselhuhn, 740 P.2d 387,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 478

(Wyo. 1987).

Cited

in

John v. State, 6 Wyo. 203, 44 P. 51,

1896 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(1896).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Privilege of newsgatherer against disclosure of confidential sources or information, 99 ALR3d 37.

§ 6-5-307.
Usurpation; penalties.

A person is guilty of usurpation if he falsely represents himself to be a public servant with the intent to induce anyone to submit to the pretended official authority or to act in reliance upon the pretense to his detriment. Usurpation is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not to exceed six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 6-5-308.
Penalty for filing false document.

A person commits a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than two (2) years, a fine of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000.00), or both, if he files with the secretary of state and willfully or knowingly:

Falsifies, conceals or covers up by any trick, scheme or device a material fact;

Makes any materially false, fictitious or fraudulent statement or representation; or

Makes or uses any false writing or document knowing the same to contain any materially false, fictitious or fraudulent statement or entry.

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 91, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2008, ch. 91, § 4, makes the act effective January 1, 2009.